Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1976XS (2) 91 sc/ns S.F. 246 Section 1. Section 12C.6, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. State funds invested in depository time certificates 3 of deposit shall draw interest at not less than the rate 4 established, effective on the date of investment. The interest 5 rate shall not be less than one-half of the effective federal 6 funds rate, as published by the federal reserve bank of New 7 York. 8